Utah statutes.
78A-11-109.   Receipt of complaints.
(1)  The commission shall receive and investigate any complaint against a
judge.
(2)  Unless the complaint alleges criminal misconduct, the commission may
decline to investigate any complaint received four or more years after the act
or omission which constitutes the alleged misconduct.
(3)  During the course of any investigation, the commission may order a
hearing to be held concerning the reprimand, censure, suspension, removal, or
involuntary retirement of a judge.
(4)  The commission shall provide the judge with all information necessary to
prepare an adequate response or defense, which may include the identity of the
complainant.
